Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Programs and Plans.

Sec. 47.80.100.
Programs for persons with disabilities.

The Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Education and Early Development, and other departments of the state as appropriate, shall, in coordination, plan, develop, and implement a comprehensive system of services and facilities for persons with disabilities that is consistent with the state plan adopted under AS

47.80.090

(5) and is dispersed geographically within the state.

The services required in (a) of this section are specialized services or special adaptations of services available to the general population and shall be directed toward the social, personal, physical, or economic habilitation or rehabilitation of persons with disabilities.

Within the limits of appropriations and other available funds, the appropriate department may itself provide the services and establish, operate, and maintain the facilities required under (a) and (b) of this section, or it may provide the services or facilities entirely or in part through contractual arrangements with public or private agencies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am §§ 27, 28 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps” in subsections (a) and (b).

Sec. 47.80.110.
Program principles.

The system of services and facilities required under AS

47.80.100

shall accord with the principles that service providers shall

make services available at times and locations that enable residents of the provider’s service area to obtain services readily;

ensure each client’s right to confidentiality and treatment with dignity;

establish staffing patterns that reflect the cultural, linguistic, and other social characteristics of the community and that incorporate multidisciplinary professional staff to meet client functional levels and diagnostic and treatment needs;

promote client and family participation in formulating, delivering, and evaluating treatment and rehabilitation;

design treatment and habilitation to maximize individual potential and minimize institutionalization; and

provide services in the least restrictive setting, enabling a person to live as normally as possible within the limitations of the disability.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 48 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 29 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disability” for “handicap” in paragraph (6).

Sec. 47.80.120.
Habilitation plans.

A state agency, contractor, or grantee who is directly responsible for providing services to persons with disabilities shall develop an individual habilitation plan for each person whose program of services utilizes state funds. The plan shall be completed in writing and furnished to the department within 30 days of admission of a client to the program of services. The plan, its renewals, and any changes of it shall have the written concurrence of the client, or the client’s parent or guardian when appropriate, and the agency or contractor responsible for providing services. The development and content of a plan shall conform to requirements established by the department by regulation. Insofar as practicable, the requirements shall conform to those established for individual habilitation plans under P.L. 91-517 or P.L. 94-103, as amended. Each plan shall be time-limited, evaluated, and renewed at least annually.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 30 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps.”

Sec. 47.80.130.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department shall

develop budgets and receive and distribute appropriations and funds under this section;

adopt regulations regarding standards of services and facilities for persons with disabilities and the quality of services and the process by which services are to be delivered;

adopt any other regulations necessary to implement this chapter;

provide technical assistance to public and private agencies in planning, developing, and implementing programs to serve persons with disabilities;

operate programs and facilities and enter into agreements, contracts, or grants necessary to provide services required under this chapter;

take the actions and undertake the obligations that are necessary to participate in federal grant-in-aid programs and accept federal or other financial aid for the study, examination, care, and treatment of persons with disabilities;

take a flexible approach to administering programs for persons with disabilities that allows each person to participate actively, with assistance based on the person’s strengths and abilities, in managing the person’s support services so that the person can achieve a meaningful life in the person’s home, job, and community.

For purposes of P.L. 91-517 and P.L. 94-103, as amended, the department is designated the sole administering agency; it shall make applications for, receive, and expend grants under P.L. 91-517 or P.L. 94-103, as amended, and otherwise exercise the powers and perform the duties and functions necessary to comply with P.L. 91-517 and P.L. 94-103, as amended.

The Department of Education and Early Development may make applications for, receive, and expend grants under P.L. 91-230 (The Education for the Handicapped Act), as amended, and otherwise exercise the powers and perform the functions necessary to comply with that Act.

When state funding is not adequate to meet service needs, the department shall establish a waiting list for persons with developmental disabilities who would be eligible to receive state-funded services under AS

47.80.100

—

47.80.170

if adequate state funding were available. The department shall, on an annual basis, review the waiting list and submit a report to the governor containing the information required under this subsection. The department shall send a copy of the report to the persons chairing the house and senate finance committees and the persons chairing the house and senate health, education and social services committees and shall notify the full legislature that the report is available to all legislators. The report must

describe the purpose for the waiting list and the strategies used to notify persons about the waiting list, and must include a copy of the information used by the department to inform individuals and families about their rights and responsibilities under AS

47.80.100

—

47.80.170

;

explain how an individual is placed on the waiting list, what criteria determine rank on the list, and how the waiting list is used to select individuals equitably and fairly across the state;

give the basic demographic information across all regions about the age, sex, and racial and ethnic background of the individuals on the waiting list;

identify the level of need and preferences of the individuals and families on the waiting list for the services and the supports that may be necessary to meet their needs and project an annual cost to meet this need;

identify how many individuals were removed from the waiting list during the 12 months covered by the report, why they were removed from the list, and how long the individuals had been waiting for services or supports before they were removed from the list;

list the number of individuals who have been on the waiting list for 90 days or more with an account of the department’s steps to regularly review each individual’s status while waiting for services or supports;

report annual data from the Department of Education and Early Development about the number of students in special education with developmental disabilities graduating from high school, dropping out of high school before reaching age 22, or reaching age 22 without graduating from high school; and

indicate that written or electronic copies of policies, manuals, and procedures used by the department to implement AS 47.80.100 — 47.80.170 are available.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions applicable to preparation of the first report required by (d) of this section, see sec. 2, ch. 76, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “persons with disabilities” for “persons with handicaps” in paragraph (a)(2), for “handicapped persons” in paragraph (a)(4), and for “the handicapped” in paragraph (a)(6).

The 2018 amendment, effective November 23, 2018, added (a)(7), and made a related change.

Sec. 47.80.135.
Gainful employment of persons with disabilities.

When carrying out duties under AS

47.80.130

related to the provision of services to a person with a disability, the department’s primary objective and preferred outcome is to help the person become gainfully employed in the general workforce of the public or private sector in an integrated workplace where persons with disabilities work with and alongside of persons without disabilities.

By December 31 of each year, the commissioner of health and social services shall provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established by AS

47.30.011

a report on the department’s progress toward the objective under (a) of this section.

In this section, “gainfully employed” means employed full time or part time for compensation that is

at or above the minimum wage; and

not less than the compensation paid by the employer for the same or similar work performed by a person who is not disabled.

History.

(§ 5 ch 19 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 19, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on August 27, 2014.

Sec. 47.80.140.
Licensing and certificates of need.

A person may not establish or operate a residential facility until the facility has been licensed under AS 47.32.

A certificate of need is required as a prerequisite for the licensing of a residential facility established after July 1, 1978, and not otherwise provided for in AS

18.07.031

—

18.07.111

. A certificate shall be issued and regulated in the same manner as provided in AS

18.07.031

—

18.07.111

for certificates of need for health care facilities. This subsection does not apply to an assisted living home licensed under AS 47.32.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 42 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, rewrote this section.

Collateral references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d, Hospitals and Asylums, §§ 5, 6.

73A C.J.S., Public and Private Institutional Care Facilities, §§ 8-10.

Sec. 47.80.150.
Liability for expense of services.

A person with a disability or the person’s legal representative acting in a representative capacity, the person’s spouse, or the person’s parents if the person is a minor shall pay or contribute to the payment of the charges for the care or treatment in accordance with the fee schedule adopted under AS

44.29.022

. The order of the department relating to the payment of charges shall be prospective in effect and may relate only to charges to be incurred, except that, if a person intentionally conceals ability to pay, the person shall be ordered to pay to the extent of the person’s ability to pay the charges accruing during the period of the concealment. The order of the department relating to the payment of charges by the person with a disability or the person’s legal representative, or the person’s spouse or parents, shall be issued within six months of the date on which the charge was incurred. The department may make necessary investigations to determine the ability to pay. The order shall remain in full force and effect unless modified by subsequent court or department orders.

As used in (a) of this section, the term “actual cost of the care and treatment” means the lesser of (1) the rate provided for by a contract entered into under this chapter, (2) the fee established under AS

44.29.022

for services provided under this chapter, or (3) if the person is under the age of 18, the cost of care of a person of the same age who is not a person with a disability and who resides with a parent or guardian, and includes expenses of transportation incidental to treatment and carrying out the intent of this chapter. In establishing fees for services under this chapter, the commissioner shall consider the income and family size of the responsible party, age of the person receiving the services, and other factors that relate to the ability to pay. Fees may not exceed the actual cost of the care or treatment.

[Repealed, § 101 ch 138 SLA 1986.]

The department may charge, or accept money or property from a person, for the care or treatment of an inpatient or outpatient or for other purposes, even if the payment is not required by an order of the department. The total payments received may not exceed the actual cost of care or treatment.

All money paid to the department by the person with a disability or on the person’s behalf, under this section, shall be deposited in the general fund.

If an order of payment is entered by the department under this section and delinquency in the payment of any amount due the state under the order continues for a period of more than 30 days after the notification by the department to the person, the legal representative, parent, or spouse of the person with a disability, the state may proceed to collect the amounts due by appropriate proceedings. Actions to enforce the collection of payments may only be brought within three years after the date of notification of a delinquent payment.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am §§ 96 — 101 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 32 — 35 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disability” for “handicap” in the first and third sentences of subsection (a), in clause (b)(3), in subsection (e), and in the first sentence of subsection (f).

Sec. 47.80.160.
Transportation.

When an individual is to be treated under this chapter, the department shall arrange, upon the request of a person having a proper interest in the individual’s treatment, and may pay for the individual’s transportation to the designated facility, with appropriate medical or nursing attendants and by the available means that are appropriate and suitable. The department may pay return transportation of an individual and appropriate medical and nursing attendants. When practicable, one or more relatives or friends of the individual to be treated shall be permitted to accompany the individual. The department may pay necessary travel, housing, and meal expenses incurred by one relative or friend in accompanying the individual to the facility if the department determines

that the best interests of the individual’s health require that the individual be accompanied by the relative or friend;

the relative or friend accompanying the individual is indigent.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978)

Sec. 47.80.170.
Provision for personal needs upon discharge.

The department shall make arrangements which are necessary to ensure that

no patient is discharged or placed on convalescent status from a designated facility without suitable clothing; and

an indigent patient discharged or placed on convalescent status is furnished suitable transportation to the patient’s permanent residence in this state or other suitable place at the discretion of the department, and a reasonable amount of money to meet immediate needs.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978)

Secs. 47.80.200 — 47.80.290.
Self-sufficiency trust fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]